Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 2

City Attorney

6-21-201. Qualifications.

The city attorney shall be an attorney at law entitled to practice in the courts of the state.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 19, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1997a171; Code 1932, § 3568; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2109.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

6-21-202. Duties and compensation.

The city attorney shall:

Direct the management of all litigation in which the city is a party, including the functions of prosecuting attorney in the city courts;

Represent the city in all legal matters and proceedings in which the city is a party or interested, or in which any of its officers are officially interested;

Attend any meetings of the board of commissioners when required by the board;

Advise the board and committees or members thereof, the city manager, and the heads of all departments and divisions, as to all legal questions affecting the city's interest; and

Approve as to form all contracts, deeds, bonds, ordinances, resolutions and other documents to be signed in the name of or made by or with the city.

The city attorney shall receive a salary to be fixed by the board.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 10, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1997a172; Code 1932, § 3569; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2110; Acts 1990, ch. 635, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Under T.C.A. § 6-54-107(a), a city judge is prohibited from contracting with the city for the performance of work to be paid for out of the treasury, and this prohibition includes acting as the city attorney, either as an independent contractor or as an employee of the city, OAG 02-106, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 111 (10/01/02).